Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2803
Accredited hospital or clinic, defined.

Accredited hospital or clinic means a hospital or clinic approved by the board.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 457;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 117;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.20;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 899.